trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns-already-added.dix
<pardef n="styck__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="år__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kam/mare__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>maren</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="grevar__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bit__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="te__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="euro__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cell/o__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="logi__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="öl__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="minut__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="glass__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="underofficer__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="syd__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="öl__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="kammare">         <i>kam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="te">              <i>te</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="styck">           <i>styck</i><par n="styck__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="sol-och-vår">     <i>sol-och-vår</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sviter">          <i>sviter</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="amalgam">         <i>amalgam</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hast">            <i>hast</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="städ">            <i>städ</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="studier">         <i>studier</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="vin">             <i>vin</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glass">           <i>glass</i><par n="glass__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="starter">         <i>starter</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="procent">         <i>procent</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pergament">       <i>pergament</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tak">             <i>tak</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lamm">            <i>lamm</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mat">             <i>mat</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dryck">           <i>dryck</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tillgångar">      <i>tillgångar</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="termer">          <i>termer</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="grevar">          <i>grevar</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="musiker">         <i>musiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blodprov">        <i>blodprov</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vattendrag">      <i>vattendrag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="logi">            <i>logi</i><par n="logi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mats">            <i>mats</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="byte">            <i>byte</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="läsk">            <i>läsk</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kos">             <i>kos</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="minut">           <i>minut</i><par n="minut__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rad">             <i>rad</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="operativsystem">  <i>operativsystem</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mil">             <i>mil</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="paradigm">        <i>paradigm</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="grammatiker">     <i>grammatiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skrin">           <i>skrin</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="botaniker">       <i>botaniker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kvart">           <i>kvart</i><par n="bit__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tekniker">        <i>tekniker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bar">             <i>bar</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="råd">             <i>råd</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>m</i><par n="m/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="koncept">         <i>koncept</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kaffe">           <i>kaffe</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cembalo">         <i>cembal</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mejl">            <i>mejl</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mark">            <i>mark</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kritiker">        <i>kritiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="syd">             <i>syd</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="euro">            <i>euro</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="knop">            <i>knop</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uppslagsverk">    <i>uppslagsverk</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fusion">          <i>fusion</i><par n="syd__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bit">             <i>bit</i><par n="bit__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hammare">         <i>ham</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fot">             <i>fot</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stopp">           <i>stopp</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="garn">            <i>garn</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="öl">              <i>öl</i><par n="öl__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="öl">              <i>öl</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="statistiker">     <i>statistiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="underofficer">    <i>underofficer</i><par n="underofficer__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cello">           <i>cell</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="återfall">        <i>återfall</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="enzym">           <i>enzym</i><par n="öl__n_nt"/></e>
